Utah statutes.
26-21-205.   Department of Public Safety -- Retention of information -- Notification of Department of Health.

The Criminal Investigations and Technical Services Division within the Department of Public Safety shall:

(1)  retain, separate from other division records, personal information, including any fingerprints, sent to it by the Department of Health pursuant to Subsection 26-21-204(3)(a); and

(2)  notify the Department of Health upon receiving notice that an individual for whom personal information has been retained is the subject of:

(a)  a warrant for arrest;

(b)  an arrest;

(c)  a conviction, including a plea in abeyance; or

(d)  a pending diversion agreement.

